Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [116J.8739] MINNESOTA CORPORATE HEADQUARTERS CREDIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Corporate headquarters" means any of the following, located in Minnesota: new text end new text begin (1) the principal offices of the principal executive officers of a qualified corporation; new text end new text begin (2) the principal offices of a division or subdivision of a qualified corporation; or new text end new text begin (3) a research and development facility of a qualified corporation. new text end new text begin (c) "Corporation" has the meaning given in section 290.01, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin (d) "Eligible employee" means an employee whose position and duties involve the performance of corporate headquarters functions. new text end new text begin (e) "Eligible expenses" means relocation or renovation expenses or employee training expenses. new text end new text begin (f) "Employee" means an employee whose wages are subject to withholding under section 290.92. new text end new text begin (g) "Employee training expenses" means: new text end new text begin (1) training and materials costs; new text end new text begin (2) trainees' wages while in a classroom setting; or new text end new text begin (3) the costs of a trainer and wages of a trainee while in an on-the-job or job shadowing setting. new text end new text begin (h) "Employee wage credit amount" means ten percent of eligible employee wages paid in a taxable year, up to $20,000 per eligible employee. new text end new text begin (i) "Maximum credit amount" means the amount of eligible expenses incurred in the taxable year in which a qualified corporation is certified under subdivision 2, multiplied by 60 percent. new text end new text begin (j) "Provisional certification" means certification of a corporation that has not yet relocated to Minnesota at the time of the application submitted under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (k) "Qualified corporation" means a corporation that has been certified by the commissioner under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (l) "Qualified research" has the meaning given in section 290.068, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin (m) "Relocation or renovation expenses" means: new text end new text begin (1) moving costs and related expenses; new text end new text begin (2) purchases of new or replacement equipment; new text end new text begin (3) leasehold and building improvements; new text end new text begin (4) renewable energy improvements; new text end new text begin (5) property assembly and development expenses, including: new text end new text begin (i) purchase, lease, or construction of buildings; new text end new text begin (ii) purchase or lease of land; new text end new text begin (iii) infrastructure improvements; and new text end new text begin (iv) site development costs; and new text end new text begin (6) any other costs related to the qualified corporation's relocation or renovation. new text end new text begin (n) "Research and development facility" means a facility where qualified research is conducted. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Certification of qualified corporations. new text end new text begin (a) A corporation may apply to the commissioner for certification or provisional certification as a qualified corporation for a taxable year. The commissioner must prescribe the form and manner for the application. Applications for certification and provisional certification must be made available on the department's website by November 1 of the preceding year. new text end new text begin (b) Within 30 days of receiving an application for certification or provisional certification under this subdivision, the commissioner must either certify or provisionally certify the corporation as satisfying the conditions required of a qualified corporation, request additional information from the corporation, or reject the application for certification or provisional certification. If the commissioner requests additional information from the corporation, the commissioner must either certify or provisionally certify the corporation or reject the application within 30 days of receiving the additional information. If the commissioner neither certifies or provisionally certifies the corporation nor rejects the application within 30 days of receiving the original application or within 30 days of receiving the additional information requested, whichever is later, then the application is deemed rejected. A corporation that applies for certification or provisional certification and is rejected may reapply. new text end new text begin (c) To receive certification or provisional certification as a qualified corporation, a corporation must satisfy all of the following conditions: new text end new text begin (1) the corporation had worldwide revenues of at least $250,000,000 in the immediately preceding taxable year; new text end new text begin (2) the corporation's corporate headquarters are located in Minnesota in the taxable year or will be located in Minnesota in the next taxable year; new text end new text begin (3) the corporation employs at least 250 eligible employees at its corporate headquarters in the taxable year or, if the corporation is relocating to Minnesota, will employ at least 250 eligible employees at its corporate headquarters in Minnesota in the next taxable year; new text end new text begin (4) the corporation has made a minimum investment of $10,000,000 in eligible expenses related to the corporate headquarters project; and new text end new text begin (5) the corporation has created new jobs or maintained the current level of positions at the corporate headquarters in the taxable year as compared to the immediately preceding taxable year. new text end new text begin (d) A corporation that has received provisional certification under this subdivision must apply for and receive certification as a qualified corporation for the year the credit is first claimed. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Credit allowed. new text end new text begin (a) A qualified corporation located in Minnesota is eligible for a credit as provided in this subdivision. new text end new text begin (b) In the first year the credit is claimed, the credit is equal to the lesser of: new text end new text begin (1) the employee wage credit amount; or new text end new text begin (2) the maximum credit amount. new text end new text begin (c) If the maximum credit amount exceeds the employee credit amount in the first year the credit is claimed, a qualified corporation may claim a credit equal to the employee wage credit amount for each taxable year, for up to ten years, until the total of employee wage credit amounts claimed equals the maximum credit amount. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Annual reporting to commissioner; continuing certification. new text end new text begin (a) By March 1 of each year immediately following the year in which a qualified corporation was first certified under subdivision 2, the qualified corporation must submit a report to the commissioner affirming that it meets the requirements of subdivision 2 for each year a credit is claimed under subdivision 3. If the commissioner determines that a corporation meets the requirements of subdivision 2, the commissioner must issue a credit certificate stating the amount of credit that the qualified corporation may claim for the taxable year. new text end new text begin (b) If a corporation does not meet the requirements of subdivision 2 for a taxable year, the commissioner must notify the corporation within 30 days of receipt of the report, and the corporation is not allowed a credit for that taxable year. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Report to legislature. new text end new text begin Beginning in 2028, the commissioner must annually report by March 15 to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over taxes and economic development in compliance with sections 3.195 and 3.197, on the tax credits issued under this section. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the number and amount of the credits issued; new text end new text begin (2) the total amount of eligible expenses resulting in certification of tax credits; and new text end new text begin (3) any other information relevant to evaluating the effect of these credits. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [290.0696] MINNESOTA CORPORATE HEADQUARTERS CREDIT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, the terms used in this section have the meanings given in section 116J.8739. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Credit allowed. new text end new text begin A qualified corporation is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this chapter equal to the amount determined under section 116J.8739, subdivision 3, and, if applicable, certified by the commissioner of employment and economic development under section 116J.8739, subdivision 2 or 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Credit refundable; appropriation. new text end new text begin If the amount of the credit under this section for any taxable year exceeds the claimant's liability for tax under this chapter, the commissioner must refund the excess to the claimant. An amount sufficient to pay the refunds required by this section is appropriated to the commissioner from the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Audit powers. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding the certification eligibility issued by the commissioner of employment and economic development under section 116J.8739, the commissioner may utilize any audit and examination powers under chapter 270C or 289A to the extent necessary to verify that the taxpayer is eligible for the credit and to assess for the amount of any improperly claimed credit. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025. new text end